West Virginia, session 2025, HB3152.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §1. Finding and declaring certain claims against the Department of Health, Bureau for Public Health; Department of Administration; Department of Health and Human Resources; Department of Military Affairs & Public Safety, Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation; Department of Transportation, Division of Highways; Department of Health, Office of the Chief Medical Examiner; Department of Administration, Office of Technology; and the West Virginia Developmental Disabilities Council, to be moral obligations of the state and directing payment thereof. The Legislature has considered the findings of fact and recommendations reported to it by the Legislative Claims Commission concerning various claims against the state and agencies thereof and, in respect to each of the following claims, the Legislature adopts those findings of fact as its own and in respect of the claims herein, the Legislature has independently made findings of fact and determinations of award and hereby declares it to be the moral obligation of the state to pay each such claim in the amount specified below and directs the Auditor to issue warrants for the payment thereof out of any fund appropriated and available for the purpose.(a)	Claim against the Department of Health, Bureau for Public Health: (TO BE PAID FROM General REVENUE FUND) West Virginia Association of Rehabilitation Facilities……………………$14,497.79West Virginia Association of Rehabilitation Facilities…………………………$41.54 Claims against the Department of Administration: (TO BE PAID FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND)(1)	Eastern Electric LLC……………………………………………………….$362,572.39 (c) Claims against Department of Administration, General Services Division:(TO BE PAID FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND)Progressive Electric, Inc…………………………………………………..$523,283.50 Claims against the Department of Health and Human Resources: (TO BE PAID FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND) West Virginia Association of Rehabilitation Facilities	$69.25West Virginia Association of Rehabilitation Facilities	$168.72West Virginia Association of Rehabilitation Facilities	$327.50West Virginia Association of Rehabilitation Facilities	$305.88West Virginia Electric Supply Company	$3,448.00 Claims against the Department of Military Affairs & Public Safety, Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation: (TO BE PAID FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND) Shawn Thomas Lester	$122.94Nathan A. Sites	$3,174.97Donald B. Surber, Jr.	$105.00 Claims against Department of Transportation, Division of Highways: (TO BE PAID FROM STATE ROAD FUND) Brenda Abbott-Fowler	$500.00	Jason Adams and Emilee N. Adams	$208.40John Mark Adkins	$338.98Karma Adkins	$200.00Sundus Ahmed	$190.26Ala Eddin Al-Astal and Amro Al-Astal	$303.32Abigail Allen	$565.94Abigail Allen	$845.00Cary Allen	$192.00Michael J. Allen	$250.00Monica Allen	$250.00Karen Altman	$197.31John H. Alvis	$456.26John H. Alvis	$186.25Jessica Anderson and Andrew Feltner	$392.00Jessie Anderson	$226.37Sheila D. Anderson	$139.91Tonya M. Anderson	$151.22Arlens Enterprise, LLC.	$1,000.00Amy Arnett	$148.71Christopher Audia	$1,000.00John Auville	$359.55Patricia Danielle Bailey and Alexis Danielle Bailey	$536.52Barbara Baker	$1,000.00Paul W. Baker and Linda L. Baker	$438.75Curtis L. Ball, Jr.	$500.00Patricia L. Balla and Ronald A. Balla	$500.00Christopher A. Barnum	$500.00Kathy Lynn Barr	$107.00Cecil Shane Bartram	$15,000.00Frank Beck	$430.24Amelia Bell and Stacey Bell	$209.17Kendale Berry	$118.76Karen Bewley	$372.98Kyler D. Bird	$349.87Brandi Blackburn	$197.80Daniel Blake	$1,187.20Emily Blake and Mark Blake	$246.66Loretta Blake, next friend of Sara Queen, a mentally incompetent adult………	$25,000.00Lyndsey Blanco	$500.00Gary Blankenship and April Blankenship	$636.16Bridget Blanton	$500.00Larry A. Blount	$500.00Kelly C. Blunden	$118.79Robert Boggs II	$340.49William F. Bolinger II.	$250.00Carol L. Bolyard	$419.00Philip M. Bordinat	$250.00Ryan Boso and Martha Boso	$275.43Keenen Bowers	$272.86Wendy Bowman and Paul Bowman	$166.35Richard M. Boyd	$241.66Rhonda June Brant	$320.45Rhonda June Brant	$320.72Rhonda June Brant	$403.96Rhonda June Brant	$393.04Randall S. Brewer	$1,426.37Joshua H. Britton and James Britton	$201.88James Keith Brock and Ashley Brock	$119.65John W. Brooks	$293.00Donald J. Brown	$416.59Janet Brown	$100.00Kelly Buckley	$660.87Oather Burdette	$186.45Stephen R. Burdette	$250.00Brooklyn Burford and Zachary Horrocks	$126.90Misty D. Burger and Stacey L. Smith	$664.83Lori J. Burgess	$250.00David R. Burgey and Teresa Burgey	$385.48Brent M. Burns and Heather L. Burns	$411.60Jonathan Byrd and Amy Byrd	$12,000.00Keith Cameron	$1,000.00Jessica M. Campbell	$509.44Kenneth Campbell	$466.54Tammy Campbell and Arlie Campbell	$151.57Tammy Campbell and Arlie Campbell	$186.99Mariah Carr	$326.35Andy Carte	$181.54Megan Casner	$286.74Ralph Caudill and Kimberly Caudill	$263.95Grace Chaffins.	$500.00Teresa Chidester	$500.00Kodi Cochran and Carley Cochran	$749.89Michael Coen	$219.19Courtney Coleman.	$138.00Shane Coleman and Beth Coleman	$105.00Christina Colombo and Colin Colombo	$250.00John B. Conrad	$500.00Melissa Cooper	$500.00Karen L. Coria	$280.96Jeff Corra	$5,000.00Marisa Correa	$500.00Lynn D. Corrie	$493.25Robert Cousins	$180.07Allen Cox	$364.51Katherine Crowe and Phyllis J. Tomblin	$635.55Terry G. Crowl	$229.00Donn Cyrus	$103.79Robert Dahl and Donna Dahl	$500.00Jesse Daniel and Michelle Daniel	$500.00Lora L. Daniel and Charles Richard Daniel, Jr.	$201.11Kathryn Daniels	$227.93Maureen David	$120,450.00David B. Davis	$145.00Paul Davis, Jr.	$235.27Paul Davis, Jr.	$203.63Tamara E. Davis and Robert Davis	$4,130.00Rodney DeBerry	$300.00Joshua M. Delaney and Cassie Delaney	$260.01Stacia DeMoss	$1,000.00Kiran Devaraj	$1,000.00Jennings Dingess II	$219.37Denise Dix and David Dix	$164.24Daniel Doss	$500.00Kyle Draper	$500.00Elizabeth K. Dutchess	$271.29East Wood Volunteer Fire Department, Inc.	$426.24Teena Edmonds	$77.38William R. Ellis and Carol S. Ellis	$345.34Lawrence Eshenaur and Joyce Eshenaur	$225.00James E. Farley	$242.40Stacy L. Feather and Jordan L. Feather	$500.00David Fillingham	$228.96John Finland and Colleen Finland	$1,473.75Joseph Finley	$2,180.86Kelly J. Fitzsimmons	$1,143.04Amy Fleming and Christopher Fleming	$500.00Robert Fluharty and Janet Fluharty	$186.55Shelia Marie Forbes and Roy Thomas Forbes	$500.00Catrina Forrest	$2,120.00Gary D. Foster 	$990.43Joshua C. Fowler	$500.00Thomas William Fox II	$314.97Michael F. Fragmin	$238.73Peter Gant	$199.21Donald G. Gibson	$500.00Kendra S. Gibson	$591.31Tommie Goff	$269.64Edward M. Goldcamp and Jennifer C. Goldcamp	$182.44Timothy Good and Wendy Good	$241.45Skip A. Gosper	$500.00Albert L. Graham	$500.00Gary Graley	$335.00Roy D. Grimm	$400.00Lakeisha Guerrant	$475.74Thomas N. Gwinn	$500.00Seth Hansen	$239.10Phyllis J. Hardesty	$262.16Alyssa Hardin and Mike Hardin	$354.45Beau Harman and Courtney Harman.	$190.47Katrina Harmon 	$751.55Vanessa Harper	$210.21Franklin D. Hayes, Jr. and Sherri Lynn Hayes 	$352.42Jason Andrew Helper and Kimberly Helper	$284.21Charles Hendershot	$246.50Trevor Hennig and Stephen Brown	$383.06Larry D. Hensley	$278.78Charles Brian Higbee	$500.00Douglas Himes	$279.78Benjamin M. Hingst and Heather N. Hingst	$199.02Christopher L. Hinton	$3,500.00Linda L. Hoff	$500.00Candice Holbrook	$692.40Timothy Holcomb and Diana Holcomb	$500.00David L. Holman and Vandy A. Holman	$1,600.00William D. Holstein and John Holstein	$500.00Brittany Honaker	$266.50Glenna Howell	$970.10Whitney Huddleston	$296.94Ethne Hudson	$234.77Emily Ann Hutson	$349.75Joan Marie Ingersoll	$500.00Ana Jackson and Charles Jackson	$198.11Connie L. Jarrett	$454.84Zachary J. Jeffreys and Joel L. Jeffreys	$269.11Briseis L. Jenkins	$535.55Shannon Johnson	$405.51Megan Joseph and Gavin Joseph.	$500.00Reshma Joy and Biju George	$198.29Reshma Joy and Biju George.	$397.59Jonathan Kanoskie	$220.52Sara Karsten	$500.00James W. Kelley, Jr. and Letitia Kelly	$496.52Robert W. Kelly	$2,500.00Cecila Kennedy	$94.19Michael L. Kidd	$1,000.00Joseph Kimble	$201.99Josephine Kincaid and Jimmy Kincaid	$485.41Richard King and Celena King	$569.00Ricky E. King and Valerie D. King	$192.60Tiffany King	$210.00Tammy Koontz	$314.51Michael Kroll	$500.00Helen Louise Krynicki and George Krynicki	$267.41Joseph Cain Kurczak	$236.50Rebecca Labelle	$281.65Beverly Lafferty and Randall Lafferty	$716.03Franklin Lambert	$714.89Jeffrey Lapkowicz	$500.00Joyce Larch	$132.50Anna J. Latz	$1,000.00Tiffani Legros	$282.48Ryan Lenhart	$550.01Virgil T. Leques and Virginia B. Leques	$51.50Lorrie Ann Lewis	$615.92Cynthia C. Lewis and Robert L. Lewis II	$519.68Jessica Liller and Aaron Liller	$239.80Scott Link and Kelly Link	$691.80Timothy A. Liptrap and Jarod R. Liptrap	$207.52LMS Construction, Inc.	$6,093.25Jennifer Long	$259.30Rebecca Lucas	$500.00Tina Lucas and Basil Lucas	$72.01Travis Luther	$8,000.00Farrah Machado	$473.25Kaleb Mackey	$180.00Erianna Macklin	$500.00Wendy MacLeery	$500.00John MacLeod	$423.91Jordan Malone	$132.99Olivia Mandich	$204.36Philip R. Marchun	$418.36Vincent Marino	$500.00Makenzie Melko Marshall	$1,000.00Gregory A. Martin	$500.00June C. Martin	$600.00Peri Martin and Leanna Martin	$500.00William Martin	$1,000.00Christopher Mason and Kim R. Mason	$215.45Kenneth James Mason, Jr.	$500.00Rachel Maxson	$500.00Cindy May	$302.00Dayton May	$100.00Kevyn McBride and Lisa McBride	$916.60Tanus McClanahan and Sheila McClanahan 	$250.00Michael McClaskey and McClaskey Trucking, Inc.	$1,000.00Brian C. McClung	$994.95Jillya McCown and Robert McCown	$811.79James McCracken and Amy McCracken	$451.32John McCutcheon and Dola McCutcheon	$266.07Carolyn A. McDaniel and Joe R. McDaniel	$100.00Erin McGhee	$500.00Adam B. McKinney	$500.00Josh McMillion	$500.00Shenna Meadows and Michael Townsend	$835.98Teresa Medley and Gary Medley	$333.90Patrick Meighen	$382.12Jason Merritt	$500.00Beverly A. Michael	$500.00Ryan J. Michael	$233.21Christina Mikels	$855.21Tabitha L. Miller	$1,112.57Khaja Mohammed and Nazia Mohammed	$500.00Rebecca Mohler and Harold R. Mohler	$152.76Lorrie Moles	$91.72Rebecca Morgan and James A. Morgan II	$107.25Travis Robert Morgan	$926.42Mindi Morrow	$159.00Carolyn L. Mullins	$453.43Nina Mullins	$181.89Seth Nardo	$569.21Jeffrey Naylor and Michelle L. Naylor	$5,293.81Neier Inc. and Stephanie Wilson	$1,250.00John L. Nelson and Winona M. Nelson	$500.00Jamie Niday	$500.00Roger E. Null	$333.58Leah Oney	$655.54Shannon Orso	$295.95Debra Osborne and Dennis Osborne	$263.37Max Alexander Ostrow	$500.00Julia Ozie	$379.85Natalie Pagan	$392.57Donna L. Palmer	$218.79Teresa Lewis Parrish	$161.60Jordan Lee Pascoe	$562.61Zacharias Pauley	$500.00Carol Pavlik-Buck	$241.77Ming Pei and Xiulian Hang	$500.00Richard A. Penn and Phyllis E. Penn.	$100.00Chad Pennington	$750.00Willis Perrine and Crystal Ann Perrine	$917.50Annadean Y. Petry	$99.14Donna Peyatt	$148.73Phillip J. Poling and Misty J. Bosnick	$250.00Teresa M. Pittman and Donna S. Cooper	$500.00Christina Poli.	$500.00William D. Potter, Jr.	$818.02Jill Powell and Eric Powell	$243.68Carrie Pratt and Shawn Pratt	$32.75Keith A. Pratt	$250.00Stacy Price	$485.19Edward R. Prichard and Pamela Prichard	$500.00Sydney Pringle	$616.38Keri A. Prunty and John C. Prunty	$500.00James Robert Quesenberry II	$463.25Shanelle Rainer	$500.00Jeremiah Raines	$382.98Laura Randolph-Kennedy	$1,000.00Robert W. Reed and Linda L. Reed	$278.58Dencil E. Reynolds	$1,882.62Barry Rickert	$704.00Derek Robertson	$500.00Craig Robinson and Heather DiMarzio	$237.56David Rodavich	$250.00Michael J. Rogier and Wanda J. Rogier	$444.03Nathan T. Rohrbough	$543.49Robert L. Rohrbough	$139.05Angela Roop	$154.07Jeff Roth and Lori Roth	$500.00Aaron P. Rucker	$737.31Chase A Russell	$790.98David A. Russell, Jr.	$300.38Melissa Russell	$500.00Sylvia Sager	$500.00Zachary Sallade and Rachel Sallade	$500.00Melissa Sampson	$327.61Brenden Sarber and Hailey Sarber	$197.09Brennan Sarver and Molly Brumfield	$372.87Glen Micka Satterfield	$269.41Samantha Scarneo-Miller	$291.00George L. Schaefer, Jr. and Kim Schaefer	$1,000.00Samuel Schultz	$1,386.94Sharon Scott and Donovan Cutlip	$500.00Daniel E. Seckman and Tamara L. Seckman	$181.90Lauren Seggie and Maxx Biddle.	$500.00Kimberly Self and Todd Minkos	$151.85Philip Demitrius Serevicz	$478.10Stephanie Sheline	$100.00Sally Shepherd and Walton Shepherd	$1,000.00Troy Shepherd	$1,000.00Andrew S. Shiflett and Edward S. Shiflett	$500.00Anthony Shillingburg and Sarah Shillingburg	$1,000.00Patsy A. Shinault	$225.92Jerry Shoemaker and Joanna Shoemaker	$180.83Jo Ann Shorac	$250.00Robert Shrader	$301.74Subodh Solar Shrestha	$350.00William Shuff III and Theresa Shuff	$1,000.00Rachael Siders	$100.00Mary Carolyn Sisler	$183.23Terry W. Sizemore	$138.07Edward W. Sloan	$500.00Andrew Smallridge	$1,564.42Alec T. Smith	$356.44Braxton Smith and Clarence Smith, Jr.	$379.69Douglas A. Smith	$250.00Michael P. Smith	$674.69Ray A. Smith and V. Christine Smith	$5,000.00Sinjin Smith and Paul Smith	$118.87William M. Smith, Jr.	$1,000.00Mark E. Snapp	$250.00Julio Solares	$685.25Source Contractors, LLC	$220,791.27Bethany Sowards and Joshua Sowards	$711.81Shafic Sraj	$270.30Robert E. Stahl	$411.15Jonathan C. Stalnaker and April D. Stalnaker	$240.75Sean Stanley	$352.77Sean M. Stanley	$336.34Sherry Smith Stanley	$296.01Miranda Stark	$1,041.75Deborah Starks	$108.06Taylor Stephenson	$137.46Jeremy Stewart	$500.00Ted Stilgenbauer and Johnna Stilgenbauer	$224.60Ted Stilgenbauer and Johnna Stilgenbauer	$170.13Gina Stoffer and Timothy Stoffer	$169.60Edward A. Stone and Alice Stone	$1,000.00Bill J. Stout	$258.13Jared Stout	$500.00Tanya M. Stricklin	$500.00John J. Sullivan	$1,128.88James Drew Summers	$500.00Kandus H. Sumpter	$194.20Jessica L. Suriano	$500.00Rachel Sviantek	$899.99Bruce L. Swanson and Linda S. Swanson	$383.66Thomas Sykes and Caitlin Sykes	$328.59Erdinc Tanriverdiler	$503.13Jordan Terry	$156.00Mia Terry and Shellie Terry	$1,000.00Jerrid Thomas	$342.12Sara D. Thomas	$211.95Zachariah Thomas	$500.00Jeanessa Thompson	$500.00Kerry S. Thompson	$668.39Clara L. Thorne	$115.56Rachel Tolley and Jamie Tolley	$250.00Robin Tomaselli	$250.00Marilyn S. Tompa	$416.10Amy Beth Toothman and Ryan Allen Toothman	$500.00Union Oil and Gas, Inc.	$7,647.36Michael R. Urban	$415.16James W. Vance, Jr.	$500.00Stephanie VanDerheyden	$2,640.00Laura Via	$176.12Kalee Vincent	$369.00Glenna Elaine Wagner	$98.98Ernst J. Wahl	$764.20Jason Walker	$120.84Peggy Watson	$217.88Lesley R. Weiss	$1,933.43Adam T. West	$214.51Dustin L. Whitt	$170.89Joseph Whittington and Nikki Whittington	$500.00Jonathan Wileman	$500.00Kylie A. Williams	$243.36April Williamson	$250.00Cathy E. Wilson	$99.14Amy Wirts	$289.24Leslie L. Wolfe and William J. Wolfe	$447.86Brenda Kay Wooten	$418.34David G. Yeater	$140.00Howard F. Yost, Jr.	$462.30Eric Young and Elijah Young	$500.00Eric J. Young	$500.00John H. Zickefoose	$259.49 Claim against the Department of Health, Office of the Chief Medical Examiner: (TO BE PAID FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND) West Virginia Association of Rehabilitation Facilities	$13,876.80 (h)	Claims against Department of Administration, Office of Technology:	            (TO BE PAID FROM SPECIAL REVENUE FUND)(1)	Ricoh USA, Inc.	$121,010.48(2)	Ricoh USA, Inc.	$78,642.30 Claims against the West Virginia Developmental Disabilities Council (TO BE PAID FROM THE GENERAL REVENUE FUND)(1)	West Virginia Association of Rehabilitation Facilities	……………………$4,467.35 The Legislature finds that the above moral obligations and the appropriations made in satisfaction thereof shall be the full compensation for all claimants and that prior to the payments to any claimant provided in this bill, the Legislative Claims Commission shall receive a release from said claimant releasing any and all claims for moral obligations arising from the matters considered by the Legislature in the finding of the moral obligations and the making of the appropriations for said claimant. The Legislative Claims Commission shall deliver all releases obtained from claimants to the department against which the claim was allowed. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home